Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.930

Benefits not contractual right until March 1, 2002.

The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 247, Laws of 2000 are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to March 1, 2002. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time prior to March 1, 2002.

[ 2000 c 247 s 316.]